Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1,115
Prima facie evidence of practice without being credentialed; conditions.

It shall be prima facie evidence of practice without being credentialed when any of the following conditions exist:

(1) The person admits to engaging in practice;

(2) Staffing records or other reports from the employer of the person indicate that the person was engaged in practice;

(3) Billing or payment records document the provision of service, care, or treatment by the person;

(4) Service, care, or treatment records document the provision of service, care, or treatment by the person;

(5) Appointment records indicate that the person was engaged in practice;

(6) Government records indicate that the person was engaged in practice; and

(7) The person opens a business or practice site and announces or advertises that the business or site is open to provide service, care, or treatment.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 115;

Laws 2021, LB148, § 51.